Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1104.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6152(a)(2)(i) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6152. Subpoena of records.(a) Election.--* * *(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), the health care provider or facility or a designated agent shall be entitled to receive payment of the amounts under this subsection before producing the charts or records pursuant to a subpoena. The payment shall be $20.62 for searching for and retrieving the records, $1.39 per page for the first 20 pages, $1.03 per page for pages 21 1234567891011121314151617 through 60 and 34¢ per page for pages 61 and thereafter for paper copies or reproductions on electronic media whether the records are stored on paper or in electronic format; $2.04 per page for copies from microfilm; plus the actual cost of postage, shipping or delivery. No other charges for the retrieval, copying and shipping or delivery of medical records other than those set forth in this paragraph shall be permitted without prior approval of the party requesting the copying of the medical records. The amounts which may be charged shall be adjusted annually beginning on January 1, 2013, by the Secretary of Health of the Commonwealth based on the most recent changes in the consumer price index reported annually by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. If copies are requested in an electronic format, the total payment under this subparagraph may not exceed $200.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1104PN1225 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819